Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.575

Wildfire areas—Funding wildfire risk reduction in certain counties.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, in order to prevent homelessness in any county located east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range that shares a common border with Canada and has a population of one hundred thousand or less, the department shall, to strengthen the local capacity for controlling risk to life and property that may result from wildfires, administer to these counties, funding for radio communication equipment; and fire protection service providers within these counties to provide residential wildfire risk reduction activities, including education and outreach, technical assistance, fuel mitigation and other residential risk reduction measures. For the purposes of this section, fire protection service providers include fire departments, fire districts, emergency management services, and regional fire protection service authorities. The department must prioritize funding to counties authorized in this section serving a disproportionately higher percentage of low-income residents, as defined in RCW 84.36.042, that are located in areas of higher wildfire risk, and whose fire protection service providers have a shortage of reliable equipment and resources.

[ 2017 c 280 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 c 280: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 10, 2017]." [ 2017 c 280 s 3.]